District of Columbia statutes.
29-401.01

Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Nonprofit Corporation Act of 2010”.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Licenses to conduct bingo games, raffles, or Monte Carlo night parties, see § 3-1323.
Child abuse and neglect prevention children’s trust fund, see § 4-1341.06.
Financial institutions, licensing of money lenders, “community development corporation” defined, see § 26-910.
Cable television, Public Access Corporation, formation, see § 34-1229.
Museum of the City of Washington, powers, see § 39-303.
Nonprofit healthcare entities, sale, lease, or exchange of assets with for-profit entities, see § 44-603.